District of Columbia statutes.
29-311.50

Other remedies limited.

(a)

The legality of a proposed or completed corporate action described in § 29-311.02(a) shall not be contested and the corporate action shall not be enjoined, set aside, or rescinded, in a legal or equitable proceeding by a shareholder after the shareholders have approved the corporate action.

(1)

Was not authorized and approved in accordance with the applicable provisions of:

(A)

Subchapter VII, VIII, IX, or X of this chapter;

(B)

The articles of incorporation or bylaws; or

(C)

The resolution of the board of directors authorizing the corporate action;

(2)

Was procured as a result of fraud, a material misrepresentation, or an omission of a material fact necessary to make statements made, in light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading;

(3)

Is an interested transaction, unless it has been recommended by the board of directors in the same manner as is provided in § 29-306.72 and has been approved by the shareholders in the same manner as is provided in § 29-306.73 as if the interested transaction were a director’s conflicting interest transaction; or

(4)

Is approved by less than unanimous consent of the voting shareholders pursuant to § 29-305.04 if:

(A)

The challenge to the corporate action is brought by a shareholder that did not consent and as to which notice of the approval of the corporate action was not effective at least 10 days before the corporate action was effected; and

(B)

The proceeding challenging the corporate action is commenced within 10 days after notice of the approval of the corporate action is effective as to the shareholder bringing the proceeding.

(b)

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a corporate action that:

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720